Utah statutes.
63J-4-502.   Membership -- Terms -- Chair -- Expenses.
(1)  The Resource Development Coordinating Committee shall consist of the
following 25 members:
(a)  the state science advisor;
(b)  a representative from the Department of Agriculture and Food appointed by
the executive director;
(c)  a representative from the Department of Community and Culture appointed
by the executive director;
(d)  a representative from the Department of Environmental Quality appointed
by the executive director;
(e)  a representative from the Department of Natural Resources appointed by
the executive director;
(f)  a representative from the Department of Transportation appointed by the
executive director;
(g)  a representative from the Governor's Office of Economic Development
appointed by the director;
(h)  a representative from the Division of Housing and Community Development
appointed by the director;
(i)  a representative from the Division of State History appointed by the
director;
(j)  a representative from the Division of Air Quality appointed by the
director;
(k)  a representative from the Division of Drinking Water appointed by the
director;
(l)  a representative from the Division of Environmental Response and
Remediation appointed by the director;
(m)  a representative from the Division of Radiation appointed by the
director;
(n)  a representative from the Division of Solid and Hazardous Waste appointed
by the director;
(o)  a representative from the Division of Water Quality appointed by the
director;
(p)  a representative from the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining appointed by
the director;
(q)  a representative from the Division of Parks and Recreation appointed by
the director;
(r)  a representative from the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands
appointed by the director;
(s)  a representative from the Utah Geological Survey appointed by the
director;
(t)  a representative from the Division of Water Resources appointed by the
director;
(u)  a representative from the Division of Water Rights appointed by the
director;
(v)  a representative from the Division of Wildlife Resources appointed by the
director;
(w)  a representative from the School and Institutional Trust Lands
Administration appointed by the director;
(x)  a representative from the Division of Facilities Construction and
Management appointed by the director; and
(y)  a representative from the Division of Homeland Security appointed by the
director.
(2) (a)  As particular issues require, the committee may, by majority vote of
the members present, and with the concurrence of the state planning
coordinator, appoint additional temporary members to serve as ex officio
voting members.
(b)  Those ex officio members may discuss and vote on the issue or issues for
which they were appointed.
(3)  A chair shall be selected by a majority vote of committee members with
the concurrence of the state planning coordinator.
(4) (a) (i)  Members who are not government employees shall receive no
compensation or benefits for their services, but may receive per diem and
expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties at the
rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(b) (i)  State government officer and employee members who do not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive
per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties
from the council at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  State government officer and employee members may decline to receive per
diem and expenses for their service.
